District of Columbia statutes.
25-116

Solicitor’s license requirements and qualifications.

A solicitor’s license shall authorize the licensee to sell any alcoholic beverage on behalf of the vendor whose name appears upon the license and whom the solicitor represents. A license shall be issued for only one vendor and a license shall be issued to the solicitor for each vendor whom the solicitor represents. A solicitor’s license shall allow the licensee to transport samples to and from licensed establishments.

History

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 324, ch. 4, § 11
Apr. 30, 1934, 48 Stat. 654, ch. 181, § 1
June 18, 1934, 48 Stat. 997, ch. 588
July 2, 1935, 49 Stat. 444, ch. 359
Aug. 27, 1935, 49 Stat. 898, 899, ch. 756, §§ 3-7
June 15, 1938, 52 Stat. 691, ch. 396, §§ 1, 2
May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 133, ch. 146, title V, § 501
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 103, ch. 159, § 404(d)
May 31, 1962, 76 Stat. 89, Pub. L. 87-470, § 1
Dec. 8, 1970, 84 Stat. 1393, Pub. L. 91-535, § 2
Apr. 6, 1977, D.C. Law 1-102, § 2(a), (b), 23 DCR 8732
Apr. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-73, § 3, 24 DCR 7066
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-157, § 2(b), 27 DCR 5117
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, §§ 6, 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-204, § 2, 30 DCR 185
Aug. 2, 1983, D.C. Law, 5-16, § 3, 30 DCR 3193
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(a), 30 DCR 5927
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, § 5, 34 DCR 907
Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-40, § 2(b), 38 DCR 4974
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(e), 41 DCR 1658
Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-202, § 2(b), 45 DCR 8412
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(q)(1), 46 DCR 3142
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-201, § 2(d), 55 DCR 6289

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 25-116.
1973 Ed., § 25-111.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-201 inserted “A solicitor’s license shall allow the licensee to transport samples to and from licensed establishments.”